West Virginia, session 2026, SB264.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of Environmental Protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §22-11-4 of this code, modified by the Department of Environmental Protection to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 29, 2025, relating to the Division of Water and Waste Management (requirements governing water quality standards, 47 CSR 02), is authorized.